Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2495.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; INSPIREMSP.new text end new text begin $75,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to InspireMSP to develop and execute programming to assist middle and high school aged children in Minneapolis and St. Paul to develop an interest in and connect with the creative industry in Minnesota. Money must be used for program development and career exploration in the creative industry for historically excluded youth by providing access to essential resources, networks, and hands-on experience. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end